Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [165.16] SUICIDE PREVENTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Data collection. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation, in collaboration with the commissioner of health, must identify bridges in Minnesota with a history of suicide-related deaths. The commissioner of transportation must: new text end new text begin (1) annually request and receive data from the commissioner of health regarding known suicide deaths from bridges in the state of Minnesota as obtained from the state's vital statistics records; and new text end new text begin (2) maintain a record of the data to support the identification of bridges for which suicide reduction measures may be appropriate. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Best practices. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation, in collaboration with the commissioner of health, must develop a methodology for determining when and where suicide reduction measures should be incorporated into bridge projects. The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) develop best practices for determining when suicide reduction measures should be considered on a project; new text end new text begin (2) identify potential suicide reduction measures and develop best practices for their appropriate and feasible use; and new text end new text begin (3) develop suicide reduction railing design criteria. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Railing implementation. new text end new text begin Suicide reduction railings must be implemented when determined appropriate and feasible using the methodology developed under subdivision 2. This requirement applies to bridge projects undertaken by the commissioner of transportation and by local road authorities when the project scope includes railing replacement, alteration, or addition, consistent with the design criteria developed under subdivision 2, clause (3). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Short title. new text end new text begin This section is the "Kayla's HOPE Act." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end